Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 4
Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1981, No. 523, § 7, provided that this act shall not repeal Acts 1949, No. 472 (§ 8-4-101 et seq.), either in whole or in part.

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1965, No. 183, § 6, provided that Acts 1949, No. 472, §§ 1-12 (subchapters 1 and 2 of this chapter) were designated as comprising “Part 1, Water Pollution.”

Cross References.

County and municipal financing of pollution control facilities, § 14-267-101 et seq.

Permit fees for air, water, and solid waste pollution control activities, § 8-1-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1949, No. 472, § 12: approved Mar. 29, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the pollution of the waters and the streams in the State of Arkansas from sewage, industrial waste, garbage, municipal refuse, and many other sources has created and is creating a hazard and danger to the public health of the people of the State of Arkansas, and is endangering the fish and other wildlife of the State of Arkansas; and, whereas, improper and inadequate sewer systems and disposal plants and treatment works cannot be adequately inspected, checked, and supervised under existing laws; and, whereas, present laws to prevent the pollution of the streams and to protect the health and general welfare of the people are inadequate and there are overlapping authorities as to control and regulations; and whereas, the continuance of such conditions presents an immediate and continuing threat and hazard to the public peace, health, and safety, therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1953, No. 232, § 2: Mar. 6, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “It appearing to the Legislature that the membership of the Water Pollution Control Commission as presently constituted does not adequately give representation to the other state agencies interested and informed in matters of water pollution control, and it appearing that there be an immediate public need for such representation, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 120, § 9: Feb. 21, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, operating experience under Act 472 of 1949 has revealed ambiguous and inadequate provisions which the foregoing amendments will eliminate and correct, and whereas a continuation of said ambiguous and inadequate provisions would be inimical to the proper control and abatement of water pollution and to the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 183, § 8: Mar. 10, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the pollution of the air resources of the State of Arkansas by air contaminants can create serious hazards to the public health and welfare of the people; and, whereas, it is the public policy of the state to maintain such a reasonable degree of purity of the air to the end that the least possible injury shall be done to human, plant or animal life or to property, and to maintain public enjoyment of the state's natural resources, consistent with the economic and industrial well-being of the state; and, whereas, existing laws to prevent, control, and abate air pollution are inadequate to protect the health and general welfare of the people; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 262, § 13: Mar. 9, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It being found that the existing state laws relating to water pollution control do not contain adequate legal authority for the state to continue to administer its own permit program for discharges into navigable waters within the state in lieu of that of the Federal Environmental Protection Agency and it being desirable that such authority be provided, an emergency is, therefore, declared hereby to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 743, § 11: Apr. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It being found that the existing state laws relating to water pollution control do not contain adequate legal authority for the state to continue to administer its own permit program for discharges into navigable waters within the state in lieu of that of the Federal Environmetal Protection Agency and it being desirable that such authority be provided, an emergency is, therefore, declared hereby to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 9: Apr. 9, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the 78th General Assembly that the sanctions imposed by current Arkansas law for environmental violations are among the least stringent in the nation. Thus, current law is inadequate to deter environmental violations, and in fact extends an implicit invitation to irresponsible industries. Protection of the environmental integrity of this state is essential to protect the public's health and economic well-being. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1824, § 20: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly of the State of Arkansas hereby finds and determines that the decision of the Arkansas Supreme Court in Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality v. Brighton Corp. 352 Ark. 396, 102 S.W.3d 458 (2003), has raised questions regarding the factual proof required to establish a claim for cost recovery under the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act and regarding the retroactivity of the statute. The General Assembly further finds and determines that the doubts raised by the decision in the Brighton case have created substantial uncertainty regarding the enforcement authority of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality and the rights and responsibilities of private parties under the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act, all of which require urgent resolution. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist; and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and shall apply retroactively.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-4-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act”.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472 [Part 1], § 11; 1965, No. 183, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1901.

8-4-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Any wastes” and “pollutants” include sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes;

“Discharge into the waters of the state” means a discharge of any wastes in any manner that directly or indirectly permits such wastes to reach any of the waters of the state;

“Disposal system” means a system for disposing of sewage, industrial waste, and other wastes and includes sewer systems and treatment works;

“Industrial waste” means any liquid, gaseous, or solid waste substance resulting from any process of industry, mining, manufacturing, trade, or business or from the development of any natural resources;

“Other wastes” means garbage, municipal refuse, decayed wood, sawdust, shavings, bark, lime, sand, ashes, offal, oil, tar chemicals, and all other organic or inorganic substances, not including sewage or industrial waste that may be discharged into the waters of the state;

“Person” means any state agency, municipality, governmental subdivision of the state or the United States, public or private corporation, individual, partnership, association, or other entity;

“Pollution” means such contamination or other alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any waters of the state, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, or solid substance in any waters of the state as will, or is likely to, render the waters harmful, detrimental, or injurious to public health, safety, or welfare, to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish, or other aquatic life;

“Sewage” means the water-carried waste products from residences, public buildings, institutions, or other buildings, including the excrementitious or other discharge from the bodies of humans or animals, together with such groundwater infiltration and surface water as may be present;

“Sewer system” means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, and force mains, and all other constructions, devices, and appliances appurtenant thereto, which are used for conducting sewage or industrial waste or other wastes to a point of disposal;

“Treatment works” means any plant, disposal field, lagoon, dam, pumping station, constructed drainage ditch or surface water intercepting ditch, incinerator, area devoted to sanitary landfills, or other works not specifically mentioned in this section, which is installed for the purpose of treating, stabilizing, or disposing of sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes; and

“Waters of the state” means all streams, lakes, marshes, ponds, watercourses, waterways, wells, springs, irrigation systems, drainage systems, and all other bodies or accumulations of water, surface and underground, natural or artificial, public or private, which are contained within, flow through, or border upon this state or any portion of the state.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472 [Part 1], § 1; 1961, No. 120, §§ 1, 2; 1975, No. 743, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1902; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 9; 1993, No. 165, § 9.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1961, No. 120, § 8, which amended Acts 1949, No. 472, § 10, provided, in part, that it was the purpose of the act to provide additional and cumulative remedies to prevent, abate, and control the pollution of the waters of the state, and that nothing contained in the act should be construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in equity or under the common law or statutory law, criminal or civil, nor should any provision of the act, or any action done by virtue of the act, be construed as estopping the state, or any municipality or person, as riparian owners or otherwise, in the exercise of their rights in equity or under the common law or statutory law, to suppress nuisances or to abate pollution.

In Acts 1975, No. 743, § 1, the General Assembly found and declared that since the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), provided for a permit system (National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System) to regulate the discharge of pollutants to the waters of the United States and provided that permits may be issued by states which are authorized to implement the provisions of that act, it was in the interest of the people of the State of Arkansas to amend the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, as amended (§§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, 8-4-301 — 8-4-314), in a manner so as to provide required legal authority to the State of Arkansas, through the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology, to implement the provisions of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, and thereby to continue in effect the state permit program for the prevention and elimination of pollution of all waters of the state, including navigable waters.

8-4-103. Criminal, civil, and administrative penalties.

Criminal Penalties.

Any person that violates any provision of this chapter, that commits any unlawful act under it, or that violates any rule or order of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or the Division of Environmental Quality shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to:

Imprisonment for not more than one (1) year;

A fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000); or

Both such fine and imprisonment.

For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

It shall be unlawful for a person to:

Violate any provision of this chapter, commit any unlawful act under it, or violate any rule or order of the commission or the Division of Environmental Quality and leave the state or remove his or her person from the jurisdiction of this state;

Purposely, knowingly, or recklessly cause pollution of the waters or air of the state in a manner not otherwise permitted by law and thereby create a substantial likelihood of adversely affecting human health, animal or plant life, or property; or

Purposely or knowingly make any false statement, representation, or certification in any document required to be maintained under this chapter or falsify, tamper with, or render inaccurate any monitoring device, method, or record required to be maintained under this chapter.

A person that violates subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall be guilty of a felony.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to:

Imprisonment for not more than five (5) years;

A fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000); or

Both such fine and imprisonment.

For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person that purposely, knowingly, or recklessly causes pollution of the waters or air of the state in a manner not otherwise permitted by law and thereby places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury shall be guilty of a felony.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to:

Imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years;

A fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); or

Both such fine and imprisonment.

For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

Notwithstanding the limits on fines set in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section, if a person convicted under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, subdivision (a)(2) of this section, or subdivision (a)(3) of this section has derived or will derive pecuniary gains from commission of the offenses, then the person may be sentenced to pay a fine not to exceed two (2) times the amount of the pecuniary gain.

Civil Penalties. The Division of Environmental Quality may institute a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction to accomplish any of the following:

Restrain any violation of or compel compliance with the provisions of this chapter and of any rules, orders, permits, or plans issued pursuant to this chapter;

Affirmatively order that remedial measures be taken as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this chapter;

Recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the Division of Environmental Quality and any other agency or division of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, natural resource damages;

Assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for violations of this chapter and of any rules, permits, or plans issued pursuant to this chapter; or

Recover civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

Any person that violates any provision of this chapter and rules, permits, or plans issued pursuant to this chapter may be assessed an administrative civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.

Each day of a continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for purposes of penalty assessment.

No civil penalty may be assessed until the person charged with the violation has been given the opportunity for a hearing in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.

All hearings and appeals arising under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures prescribed by §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-212, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229.

These administrative procedures may also be used to recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the Division of Environmental Quality and any other agency or subdivision of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, natural resource damages.

Before assessing a civil penalty under subsection (c) of this section, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall provide public notice of and a reasonable opportunity to comment on the proposed issuance of the order.

If the civil penalty is being assessed under an order on consent, the order shall not be effective until thirty (30) days after the publication of notice of the order.

Notice shall also be given to each member of the commission.

If a civil penalty is being assessed for a violation that occurs within the corporate limits of any municipality in Arkansas, a copy of the public notice shall be delivered to the chief executive officer of the municipality in which the alleged violation occurred, along with a copy of any proposed order concerning the violation, and the municipality shall be given a reasonable opportunity to comment on the proposed order consistent with the public notice and comment requirements of this chapter and rules promulgated under this chapter.

Notice of any administrative enforcement order shall contain the following:

The identity of the person or facility alleged to be in violation;

The location by city or county of the alleged violation;

A brief description by environmental media, that is, water, air, solid waste, or hazardous waste, impacted by the alleged violation;

The type of administrative action proposed, that is, a consent order, a notice of violation, or an emergency order; and

The amount of penalty to be assessed.

Any person that comments on a proposed assessment of a penalty under this subsection shall be given notice of any hearing held under this subsection.

In any hearing held under this subsection, the person shall have a right to intervene upon timely application.

If no adjudicatory hearing is held on a proposed order, any person that commented on the proposed order may petition the commission to set aside the order and provide an adjudicatory hearing.

A petition to set aside such an order must be filed with the commission within thirty (30) days of service of the order.

If the evidence presented by the petitioner is material and was not considered in the issuance of the order and the commission finds in light of the new evidence that the order is not reasonable and appropriate, it may set aside the order and provide a hearing.

If the commission denies a hearing under this subdivision (d)(4), it shall provide to the petitioner notice of and its reasons for the denial. The denial of such a hearing may be appealed pursuant to § 8-4-222.

On its own initiative, the commission may institute review of any enforcement action taken by the director within thirty (30) days of the effective date of the order.

As an alternative to the limits on civil penalties set in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, if a person found liable in actions brought under subsection (b) of this section or subsection (c) of this section has derived pecuniary gain from commission of the offenses, then he or she may be ordered to pay a civil penalty equal to the amount of the pecuniary gain.

All moneys collected as reimbursement for expenses, costs, and damages to the Division of Environmental Quality shall be deposited into the operating fund of the Division of Environmental Quality.

All moneys collected as civil penalties shall be deposited into the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund as provided by § 8-7-509.

In his or her discretion, the director may authorize in-kind services or cash contributions as partial mitigation of cash penalties for use in projects or programs designed to advance environmental interests.

The violator may provide in-kind services or cash contributions as directed by the Division of Environmental Quality by utilizing the violator's own expertise, by hiring and compensating subcontractors to perform the services, by arranging and providing financing for the services, or by other financial arrangements initiated by the Division of Environmental Quality in which the violator and the Division of Environmental Quality retain no monetary benefit, however remote.

The services shall not duplicate or augment services already provided by the Division of Environmental Quality through appropriations of the General Assembly.

All moneys collected that represent the costs, expenses, or damages of other agencies or subdivisions of the state shall be distributed to the appropriate governmental entity.

Pursuant to duly promulgated ordinances or regulations, any governmental entity permitted to operate a publicly owned treatment works shall have the authority to collect in a court of competent jurisdiction civil or criminal penalties in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation by industrial users of pretreatment standards or requirements.

Such a criminal or civil action may be initiated only after a majority vote of the entity's governing body resolves to pursue such an action.

For the purpose of this subsection, each day of a continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation.

The culpable mental states referenced throughout this section shall have the same definitions as set out in § 5-2-202.

Solicitation, as defined by § 5-3-301 et seq., or conspiracy, as defined by § 5-3-401 et seq., to commit any criminal act proscribed by this section and §§ 8-6-204 and 8-7-204 shall be punishable as follows:

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section that is a misdemeanor shall be a misdemeanor subject to:

Fines not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per day of violation;

Imprisonment for more than six (6) months; or

Both such fines and imprisonment;

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section that is a felony subject to fines of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day or imprisonment up to five (5) years shall be a felony subject to:

Fines up to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) per day;

Imprisonment up to two (2) years; or

Both such fines and imprisonment;

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section that is a felony subject to fines of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per day or imprisonment up to ten (10) years shall be a felony subject to:

Fines up to seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per day;

Imprisonment up to seven (7) years; or

Both such fines and imprisonment; and

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section that is a felony subject to fines of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per day or imprisonment up to twenty (20) years shall be a felony subject to:

Fines up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per day;

Imprisonment up to fifteen (15) years; or

Both such fines and imprisonment.

In cases considering suspension of sentence or probation, efforts or commitments by the defendant to remediate any adverse environmental effects caused by the defendant's activities may be considered by the court to be restitution as contemplated by § 5-4-301.

A business organization or its agents or officers may be found liable under this section in accordance with the standards set forth in § 5-2-501 et seq. and sentenced to pay fines in accordance with the provisions of § 5-4-201(d) and (e).

A person that uses a cleaning agent in violation of this chapter upon conviction is guilty of a violation and is subject to a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

A person that sells, distributes, or manufactures a cleaning agent in violation of this chapter upon conviction is guilty of a violation and is subject to a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The Division of Environmental Quality may seize any cleaning agent held for sale or distribution in violation of this chapter.

The seized cleaning agents are considered forfeited.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 9; 1973, No. 262, § 10; 1975, No. 743, § 8; 1983, No. 733, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1909; Acts 1987, No. 529, § 1; 1991, No. 884, § 1; 1991, No. 1057, §§ 3, 5; 1993, No. 163, § 10; 1993, No. 165, § 10; 1993, No. 454, § 2; 1993, No. 461, § 2; 1993, No. 731, § 3; 1995, No. 384, § 5; 1995, No. 895, § 1; 2003, No. 133, § 1; 2005, No. 1824, § 5; 2013, No. 1127, § 1;
2019, No. 315, §§ 449-455; 2019, No. 693, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2467-2475.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1824, § 1, provided: “The purpose of this Act is to resolve questions that have arisen regarding the phrase ‘at the time of disposal’ in Arkansas Code § 8-7-512(a)(3) and § 8-7-512(a)(4), as interpreted by the Arkansas Supreme Court in Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality v. Brighton Corporation, et al., 352 Ark. 396, 102 S.W.3d 458 (2003), and to clarify that the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act is remedial in nature and should be applied retroactively.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1973, No. 262, § 1, provided that it was the purpose of the act to amend the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act (§ 8-4-101 et seq.), in such manner as to qualify and provide required legal authority to the State of Arkansas, through Department of Pollution Control and Ecology (now the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission), for participation in the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System as provided by the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, adopted October 18, 1972 (codified primarily as 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.), and to continue in effect the state permit program for the prevention and elimination of pollution of all waters of the state, including navigable waters.

For legislative findings and declarations for Acts 1975, No. 743, see Publisher's Notes to § 8-4-102.

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 1, provided: “The General Assembly finds and determines that the criminal and civil penalties imposed by current law do not accurately reflect the degree of concern which the state places upon its environmental resources. The current criminal penalties for hazardous waste and other violations are among the lowest in the nation. Civil penalties for violations of the state water, air, solid waste and hazardous waste pollution control statutes are set at the minimum necessary to receive federally delegated programs. In declaring itself ‘The Natural State,’ the State of Arkansas demonstrated its commitment to its environmental resources. This commitment must be reflected in its environmental enforcement program. This act shall be liberally construed so as to achieve remedial intent.”

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 5, is also codified as §§ 8-6-204 (f)-(i) and 8-7-204 (f)-(i).

Acts 1993, No. 731, § 1, provided: “Purpose. The state of Arkansas has an abundance of environmental concerns which need research and study, as well as concerns which have an immediate remedy but are absent funds to facilitate their implementation. This amendment serves to clarify the existing use of inkind services as penalties, to include cash contributions for use in worthy environmental projects and to advance environmental interests.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in the introductory language of (i), inserted “as defined by § 5-3-301 et seq.” and deleted “§ 5-3-301 et seq. and” following “as defined by”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315, throughout the section, deleted “regulation” following “rule”, substituted “rules” for “regulations”, and made similar changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693, in (l)(1) and (l)(2), substituted “upon conviction is guilty of a violation and is” for “is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(A); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” throughout the section.

8-4-104. Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission — Members.

There is created and established an Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall be composed of fifteen (15) members:

The Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint eight (8) members.

Each congressional district shall be represented on the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission by at least one (1) member, and no district shall have more than two (2) members of the eight (8) appointees.

The Governor shall not appoint a member to represent any specific or special interest group, organization, or philosophy.

However, in making appointments to the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the Governor shall appoint individuals who have knowledge or expertise in matters within the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, including government, business or industry, agriculture and livestock, forestry, health, ecology, recreation and tourism, and geology.

Each member appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years; and

The other seven (7) members of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall be:

The Secretary of the Department of Health, or his or her designee;

The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture, or his or her designee;

The Director of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, or his or her designee;

The State Forester, or his or her designee on behalf of the Arkansas Forestry Commission;

The Director of the Oil and Gas Commission, or his or her designee;

The Director of the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, or his or her designee; and

The State Geologist, or his or her designee, on behalf of the Arkansas Geological Survey.

Elected city, county, and state officials shall not serve on the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission after the expiration of any current member's term.

In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the Governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy temporarily who shall serve until the next meeting of the Senate, when some person shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the consent and approval of the Senate, to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

The chair and vice chair shall be elected annually.

The members of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission representing the state agencies shall not serve as chair or vice chair.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall hold at least four (4) regular meetings in each calendar year at times and places to be fixed by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and such other meetings as may be necessary.

Special meetings may be called at the discretion of the chair, and they shall be called by him or her upon written request of two (2) members of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission by delivery of written notice to each member of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

Nine (9) members of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall constitute a quorum to transact business in both regular and special meetings.

Each member of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission representing state agencies shall receive no additional salary or per diem for services as a member of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission but may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The other seven (7) members appointed by the Governor may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472 [Part 1], § 2; 1953, No. 232, § 1; 1959, No. 211, § 1; 1965, No. 183, § 2; 1985, No. 930, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1903; Acts 1991, No. 744, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 44; 2001, No. 318, § 1; 2005, No. 2224, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2476.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1949, No. 472, § 2, in part, created and established within the State Board of Health a Water Pollution Control Commission. Acts 1965, No. 183, § 2, in part, amended the section to create and establish the Arkansas Pollution Control Commission.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 8, in part, transferred the Pollution Control Commission and its functions, powers, and duties to the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology by a type 4 transfer and provided in part, that any reference to the Pollution Control Commission and its director would be deemed to refer to the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology and the director of the department, respectively. However, § 25-2-107 provides that governing bodies such as the Pollution Control Commission shall retain their statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions upon transfer by a type 4 transfer.

Additionally, Acts 1971, No. 38, § 8, referred to the Commission on Pollution Control and Ecology.

Acts 1973, No. 262, § 2, which amended Acts 1949, No. 472, § 2(b), referred to a Commission on Pollution Control and Ecology, which is probably the same commission as the Arkansas Pollution Control Commission created by Acts 1949, No. 472, § 2(a) as amended. However, Acts 1973, No. 262 did not change the name of the commission created in Acts 1949, No. 472, § 2(a) as Acts 1985, No. 930, § 1, in part, amended Acts 1949, No. 472, § 2, to create an Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

Acts 1991, No. 744, § 1, provided, in part, that initial members of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall be appointed by the Governor as follows: one (1) member for one (1) year, two (2) members for two (2) years, two (2) members for three (3) years and two (2) members for four (4) years. The section further provided that those members serving on July 1, 1991, would continue to serve for the remainder of their terms.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “fifteen (15) members” for “thirteen (13) members” in the introductory language of (b); substituted “eight (8) members” for “seven (7) members” in (b)(1)(A); substituted “eight (8) appointees” for “seven (7) appointees” in (b)(1)(B); substituted “seven (7) members” for “six (6) members” in the introductory language of (b)(2); substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (b)(2)(A); rewrote (b)(2)(B); and added (b)(2)(C) through (b)(2)(G).

8-4-105. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Director of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, §
2477, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1949, No. 472 [Part 1], § 2; 1963, No. 503, § 1; 1973, No. 262, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1903; Acts 1991, No. 744, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 16.

8-4-106. Technical and other services and public assistance.

Technical, scientific, legal, or other services may be performed, insofar as practicable, by personnel of other state agencies and educational institutions and the Attorney General. However, the personnel of these state agencies shall receive no additional salary or wages for their services to the Division of Environmental Quality.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, however, may employ and compensate, within appropriations available, consultants and such assistants and employees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and prescribe their powers and duties.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472 [Part 1], § 2; 1963, No. 503, § 1; 1965, No. 183, § 3; 1973, No. 262, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1903; Acts 1991, No. 744, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 17; 2019, No. 910, § 2478.

Publisher's Notes.

For legislative purpose of Acts 1973, No. 262, see Publisher's Notes to § 8-4-103.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a) and (b).

8-4-107. Prosecution of public nuisance actions.

In any legal action arising from, relating to, or including violations of laws or rules charged to the enforcement authority of the Division of Environmental Quality that also alleges the existence of a public nuisance at common law, the Attorney General or the division may serve as the instrumentality of the state authorized to initiate and prosecute such action.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 516, § 4; 1999, No. 1164, § 18; 2019, No. 315, § 456; 2019, No. 910, § 2479.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” and “division” for “department”.